South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1011.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Barnwell National Guard Armory SECTION 1.    Notwithstanding Sections 1-11-58 and 25-1-1660 of the S.C. Code, the Department of Administration, the State Fiscal Accountability Authority, or the appropriate agency, is directed to transfer ownership of the National Guard Armory located at 10233 Marlboro Avenue, Barnwell, South Carolina, to Barnwell County. Time effective SECTION 2.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 19th day of May, 2026. -- T. ----XX----